Washington statutes.
RCW 18.134.050

Out-of-state health care practitioner.

An out-of-state health care practitioner may provide telehealth services to a patient located in this state if the out-of-state health care practitioner:

(1) Holds a current license or certification required to provide health care in this state or is otherwise authorized to provide health care in this state, including through a multistate compact of which this state is a member; or

(2) Holds a license or certification in good standing in another state and provides the telehealth services:

(a) In the form of a consultation with a health care practitioner who has a practitioner-patient relationship with the patient and who remains responsible for diagnosing and treating the patient in the state;

(b) In the form of a specialty assessment, diagnosis, or recommendation for treatment. This does not include the provision of treatment; or

(c) In the form of follow up by a primary care practitioner, mental health practitioner, or recognized clinical specialist to maintain continuity of care with an established patient who is temporarily located in this state and received treatment in the state where the practitioner is located and licensed.

[ 2024 c 212 s 6.]